en: Bearing construction type: Angular contact; Ball (radial); Cartridge; Cup and cone; Loose ball; Roller; Other
zh-CN: 轴承结构类型: 角接触; 滚珠（径向）; 盒式; 珠挡式; 散珠; 滚子; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de construção do rolamento: Contato angular; Esfera (radial); Cartucho; Capa e cone; Esfera solta; Rolo; Outros
el: Τύπος κατασκευής ρουλεμάν: Γωνιακής επαφής; Ένσφαιρο (ακτινικό); Κασέτας; Κώνου-ποτηριού; Χύμα μπίλιες; Κυλινδρικό; Άλλο
cs: Typ provedení ložiska: S kosoúhlým stykem; Kuličkové (radiální); Zapouzdřené; Kónusové; Volné kuličky; Válečkové; Jiné
de: Lagerkonstruktionsart: Schräglager; Kugel (radial); Kompaktlager; Konuslager; Lose Kugeln; Rolle; Sonstige
it: Tipo di costruzione del cuscinetto: A contatto obliquo; A sfere (radiale); A cartuccia; A coppa e cono; A sfere libere; A rulli; Altro
hr-HR: Vrsta konstrukcije ležaja: S kutnim dodirom; Kuglični (radijalni); Uložak; Čašica i konus; Slobodne kuglice; Valjkasti; Ostalo
ko: 베어링 구조 유형: 앵귤러 콘택트; 볼(레이디얼); 카트리지; 컵 앤 콘; 루즈 볼; 롤러; 기타
tr: Rulman yapısı türü: Eğik bilyalı; Bilyalı (radyal); Kartuş; Çanak ve koni; Serbest bilye; Makaralı; Diğer
nb: Konstruksjonstype for kulelager: Vinkelkontakt; Kule (radial); Patron; Kopp og konus; Løse kuler; Rulle; Annet
fi: Laakerin rakennetyyppi: Viistokuula; Kuula (säteittäinen); Kasetti; Kartiolaakeri; Irtokuula; Rulla; Muu
lt-LT: Guolio konstrukcijos tipas: Kampinio kontakto; Rutulinis (radialinis); Kasetinis; Kūginis („Cup and cone“); Laisvų rutuliukų; Ritininis; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta konstrukcije ležaja: S poševnim dotikom; Kroglični (radialni); Zaprt ležaj; Konusni; Kroglice; Valjčni; Drugo
pl: Typ konstrukcji łożyska: Skośne; Kulkowe (poprzeczne); Maszynowe; Kulkowo-stożkowe; Kulki luzem; Wałeczkowe; Inne
da: Lejekonstruktionstype: Vinkelkontakt; Kugle (radial); Kassette; Cup og cone; Løs kugle; Rulle; Andet
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie ložiska: S kosouhlým stykom; Guľôčkové (radiálne); Kazetové; Kužeľové; Voľné guľôčkové; Valčekové; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de construção do rolamento: Contacto angular; Esferas (radial); Cartucho; Copo e cone; Esferas soltas; Rolos; Outro
th: ประเภทโครงสร้างของตลับลูกปืน: แองกูลาร์คอนแทค; ลูกปืนกลม (แนวรัศมี); ตลับ; เบ้าและกรวย; ลูกปืนเม็ด; ลูกกลิ้ง; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 軸承結構類型: 角接觸; 滾珠 (徑向); 匣式; 碗錐式; 散珠; 滾子; 其他
sv: Typ av lagerkonstruktion: Vinkelkontakt; Kullager (radiellt); Kassett; Kona och skål; Lösa kulor; Rullager; Övrigt
fr: Type de construction du roulement: Contact oblique; Billes (radial); Cartouche; Cuvette et cône; Billes libres; Rouleaux; Autre
ja: ベアリング構造タイプ: アンギュラコンタクト; ボール (ラジアル); カートリッジ; カップアンドコーン; ルーズボール; ローラー; その他
es: Tipo de construcción del cojinete: Contacto angular; Bolas (radial); Cartucho; Copa y cono; Bolas sueltas; Rodillo; Otro
ru: Тип конструкции подшипника: Радиально-упорный; Шариковый (радиальный); Картриджный; Конус-чашка; Насыпные шарики; Роликовый; Другое
vi: Kiểu cấu tạo vòng bi: Tiếp xúc góc; Bi (hướng tâm); Cartridge; Chén và côn; Bi rời; Con lăn; Khác
nl: Type lageronstructie: Hoekcontact; Kogel (radiaal); Cartridge; Cup en conus; Losse kogels; Rol; Overig
ro-RO: Tipul de construcție al rulmentului: Contact unghiular; Cu bile (radial); Cartuș; Con și cuvetă; Bile libere; Cu role; Altele
bg-BG: Тип конструкция на лагера: С ъглов контакт; Сачмен (радиален); Капсулован; Конусен; Насипни сачми; Ролков; Друго
hu: Csapágy szerkezeti típusa: Ferde hatásvonalú; Golyós (radiális); Patronos; Kónuszos; Szabadgolyós; Görgős; Egyéb